District of Columbia statutes.
2-416

Liability of employee to District for negligent damage to its property.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed so as to relieve any District employee from liability to the District for negligent damage to or loss of District property.

July 14, 1960, 74 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 86-654, § 7
1981 Ed., § 1-1216.
1973 Ed., § 1-926.